District of Columbia statutes.
2-220.06

Notice.

Each recipient and subcontractor of a recipient shall provide to each affiliated employee covered by this subchapter a fact sheet concerning the payment and enforcement requirements under §§ 2-220.03 and 2-220.08, and shall also post a notice concerning these requirements in a conspicuous site in its place of business. The Mayor shall provide the fact sheet and notice to each recipient which shall include:

(1)

Notice of the living wage hourly rate;

(2)

A summary of the requirements under §§ 2-220.03 and 2-220.07; and

(3)

Information concerning the enforcement of this subchapter including the name, address, and telephone number of the individual or entity to which complaints of noncompliance should be made.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 106, 53 DCR 2602
This section is referenced in § 2-220.04.